California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) Subscribe to an organic waste recycling service that may include mixed waste processing that specifically recycles organic waste.

(4) Make other arrangements consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision
 (b) of Section 42649.84.

(c) A business that is a property owner may require a lessee or tenant of that property to source separate their organic waste to aid in compliance with this section.

(d) (1) A business subject to subdivision (a) and that provides customers access to the business shall provide customers with an organic waste recycling bin or container to collect material purchased on the premises for immediate consumption and that fulfills all of the following requirements:

(A) Is
 in the same area as a bin or container for trash other than recyclable organic waste, except in restrooms.

(B) Is visible and easily accessible.

(C) Is clearly marked with educational signage indicating what is appropriate to place in the organic waste recycling bin or container in accordance with state law and the local jurisdiction’s solid waste ordinances and practices.

(2) Full-service restaurants are exempt from the requirements of this subdivision if the full-service restaurant provides its employees an organic waste recycling bin or container to collect
 material purchased on the premises for immediate consumption and implements a program to collect recyclable organic waste.

(3) With respect to a park that is subject to subdivision (a), both of the following apply:

(A) This subdivision only applies to permanent, nonmobile food service facilities with dedicated seating areas that are not full-service restaurants.

(B) In lieu of providing an organic waste recycling bin or container as required by paragraph (1), a facility identified in this paragraph may implement a process for recycling organic waste from customers that yields results comparable to or greater in volume and quality to results attained by providing an organic waste recycling bin or container. 

(4) The department shall develop model signage that businesses may
 use in implementing paragraph (1).

(5) For a park that is subject to subdivision (a), this subdivision shall apply on and after January 1, 2022.

(e) A business generating organic waste shall arrange for the recycling services required by this section in a manner that is consistent with state and local laws and requirements, including a local ordinance or local jurisdiction’s franchise agreement, applicable to the collection, handling, or recycling of solid and organic waste.

(f) When arranging for
 gardening or landscaping services, the contract or work agreement between a business subject to this section and a gardening or landscaping service shall require that the organic waste generated by those services be managed in compliance with this chapter.

(g) (1) A multifamily residential dwelling that consists of fewer than five units is not a business for purposes of this chapter.

(2) A business that is a multifamily dwelling is not required to arrange for the organic waste recycling services specified in subdivision (b) for food waste that is generated by the business.

(h) If separate organic waste collection and recycling services are not offered through a local ordinance or local jurisdiction’s franchise agreement, a business generating organic waste may arrange for separate organic waste
 collection and recycling services, until the local ordinance or local jurisdiction’s franchise agreement includes organic waste recycling services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 56, Sec. 4.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.82.

(a) (1) In addition to the requirements of Section 42649.3, each jurisdiction shall implement an organic waste recycling program that is appropriate for that jurisdiction and designed specifically to divert organic waste generated by businesses subject to Section 42649.81, whether or not the jurisdiction has met the requirements of Section 41780.

(2) (A) A county board of supervisors of a rural county may adopt a resolution, as prescribed in this paragraph, to make the rural county exempt from the requirements of this section. If a rural jurisdiction is a city, the city council may adopt a resolution, as
 prescribed in this paragraph, to make the rural jurisdiction exempt from this section. If a rural jurisdiction is a regional agency comprised of jurisdictions that are located entirely within one or more rural counties, the board of the regional agency may adopt a resolution, as prescribed in this paragraph, to make the rural jurisdiction exempt from the requirements of this section.

(B) A resolution adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include findings as to the purpose of and need for the exemption.

(C) A resolution to exempt a rural jurisdiction pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted to the department at least six months before the operative date of the exemption.

(D) On or after January 1, 2020, if the department determines that statewide disposal of organic waste has not been reduced to 50 percent
 of the level of disposal during the 2014 calendar year, all exemptions authorized by this paragraph shall terminate unless the department determines that applying this chapter to rural jurisdictions will not result in significant additional reductions of disposal of organic waste.

(b) If a jurisdiction, as of January 1, 2016, has in place an organic waste recycling program that meets the requirements of this section, it is not required to implement a new or expanded organic waste recycling program.

(c) The organic waste recycling program required by this section shall be directed at organic waste generators and may include, but is not limited to, one or more of the following:

(1) Implementing a mandatory commercial organic waste recycling policy or ordinance that addresses organic waste recycling.

(2) Requiring a mandatory commercial organic waste recycling program through a franchise contract or agreement.

(3) Requiring organic waste to go through a source separated or mixed processing system that diverts material from disposal.

(d) (1) The organic waste recycling program shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify all of the following:

(i) Existing organic waste recycling facilities within a reasonable vicinity and the capacities available for materials to be accepted at each facility.

(ii) Existing solid waste and organic waste recycling facilities within the jurisdiction that may be suitable for
 potential expansion or colocation of organic waste processing or recycling facilities.

(iii) Efforts of which the jurisdiction is aware that are underway to develop new private or public regional organic waste recycling facilities that may serve some or all of the organic waste recycling needs of the commercial waste generators within the jurisdiction subject to this chapter, and the anticipated timeframe for completion of those facilities.

(iv) Closed or abandoned sites that might be available for new organic waste recycling facilities.

(v) Other nondisposal opportunities and markets.

(vi) Appropriate zoning and permit requirements for the location of new organic waste recycling facilities.

(vii) Incentives available, if any, for developing new organic waste recycling facilities within the jurisdiction.

(B) Identify barriers to siting new or expanded compostable materials handling operations, as defined in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and specify a plan to remedy those barriers that are within the control of the local jurisdiction.

(C) Provide for the education of, outreach to, and monitoring of, businesses. The program shall require the jurisdiction to notify a business if the business is not in compliance with Section 42649.81.

(2) For purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), an “organic waste recycling facility” shall include compostable materials handling operations, as defined in paragraph (12) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and may include other facilities that recycle organic waste.

(e) The organic waste recycling program may include any one or more of the following:

(1) Enforcement provisions that are consistent with the jurisdiction’s authority, including a structure for fines and penalties.

(2) Certification requirements for self-haulers.

(3) Exemptions, on a case-by-case basis, from the requirements of Section 42649.81 that are deemed appropriate by the jurisdiction for any of the following reasons:

(A) Lack of sufficient space in multifamily complexes or businesses to provide additional organic material recycling bins.

(B) The current implementation by a business of actions that result in the recycling of a significant portion of its organic waste.

(C) The business or group of businesses does not generate at least one-half of a cubic yard of organic waste per week.

(D) Limited-term exemptions for extraordinary and unforeseen events.

(E) (i) The business or group of businesses does not generate at least one cubic yard of organic waste per week, if the local jurisdiction provides the department with information that explains the need for this higher exemption than that authorized by subparagraph (C).

(ii) The information described in clause (i) shall be provided to the department with
 the information provided pursuant to subdivision (f).

(iii) This subparagraph shall not be operative on or after January 1, 2020, if the department, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42649.81, determines that statewide disposal of organic waste has not been reduced to 50 percent of the level of disposal during the 2014 calendar year.

(f) (1) Each jurisdiction shall provide the department with information on the number of regulated businesses that generate organic waste and, if available, the number that are recycling organic waste. The jurisdiction shall include this information as part of the annual report required pursuant to Section
 41821.

(2) In addition to the information required by paragraph (1), each jurisdiction shall report to the department on the progress achieved in implementing its organic waste recycling program, including education, outreach, identification, and monitoring, on its rationale for allowing exemptions, and, if applicable, on enforcement efforts. The jurisdiction shall include this information as part of the annual report required pursuant to Section 41821.

(g) (1) The department shall review a jurisdiction’s compliance with this section as part of the department’s review required by Section 41825.

(2) The department also may review whether a jurisdiction is in compliance with this section at any time that the department receives information that a jurisdiction has not implemented, or is not making a good faith effort to implement, an organic waste recycling program.

(h) During a review pursuant to subdivision (g), the department shall determine whether the jurisdiction has made a good faith effort to implement its selected organic waste recycling program. For purposes of this section, “good faith effort” means all reasonable and feasible efforts by a jurisdiction to implement its organic waste recycling program. During its review, the department may include, but is not limited to, consideration of the following factors in its evaluation of a jurisdiction’s good faith effort:

(1) The extent to which businesses have
 complied with Section 42649.81, including information on the amount of disposal that is being diverted from the businesses, if available, and on the number of businesses that are complying with Section 42649.81.

(2) The recovery rate of the organic waste from the material recovery facilities that are
 used by the businesses, all information, methods, and calculations, and any additional performance data, as requested by the department from the material recovery facilities pursuant to Section 18809.4 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The extent to which the jurisdiction is conducting education and outreach to businesses.

(4) The extent to which the jurisdiction is monitoring businesses and notifying those businesses that are not in compliance.

(5) The appropriateness of exemptions allowed by the jurisdiction.

(6) The availability of markets for collected organic waste recyclables.

(7) Budgetary constraints.

(8) In the case of a rural jurisdiction, the effects of small geographic size, low population density, or distance to markets.

(9) The availability, or lack thereof, of sufficient organic waste processing infrastructure, organic waste recycling facilities, and other nondisposal opportunities and markets.

(10) The extent to which the jurisdiction has taken steps that are under its control to remove barriers to siting and expanding organic waste recycling facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 56, Sec. 5.   (AB 504)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.83.

(a) If a jurisdiction adds or expands an organic waste recycling program to meet the requirements of Section 42649.82, the jurisdiction shall not be required to revise its source reduction and recycling element or obtain the department’s approval pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 41800) of Chapter 7 of Part 2.

(b) If an addition or expansion of a jurisdiction’s organic waste recycling program is necessary, the jurisdiction shall include this information in the annual report required pursuant to Section 41821.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.84.

(a) This chapter does not limit the authority of a local governmental agency to adopt, implement, or enforce a local organic waste recycling requirement, or a condition imposed upon a self-hauler, that is more stringent or comprehensive than the requirements of this chapter.

(b) This chapter does not modify, limit, or abrogate in any manner any of the following:

(1) A franchise granted or extended by a city, county, city and county, or other local governmental agency.

(2) A contract, license, or permit to collect solid waste previously granted or extended by a city,
 county, city or county, or other local governmental agency.

(3) The existing right of a business to sell or donate its recyclable organic waste materials.

(c) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this chapter, nothing in this chapter modifies, limits, or abrogates the authority of a local jurisdiction with respect to land use, zoning, or facility siting decisions by or within that local jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.85.

A local governmental agency may charge and collect a fee from an organic waste generator to recover the local governmental agency’s costs incurred in complying with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.86.

(a) The department shall identify and recommend actions to address, with regard to both state agencies and the federal government, the permitting and siting challenges associated with composting and anaerobic digestion, and to encourage the continued viability of the state’s organic waste processing and recycling infrastructure, in partnership with the California Environmental Protection Agency and other state and regional agencies. These other state and regional agencies shall include, but are not limited to, the State Air Resources Board, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, the Public Utilities Commission, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the State Water Resources Control Board, California regional water quality control
 boards, and air pollution control and air quality management districts.

(b) The department shall cooperate with local governmental agencies and industry to provide assistance for increasing the feasibility of organic recycling by promoting processing opportunities and the development of new infrastructure of sufficient capacity to meet the needs of generators, and developing sufficient end-use markets throughout the state for the quantity of organic waste required to be diverted.

(c) The department shall identify and post on its Internet Web site state financing mechanisms and state funding incentives that are available for in-state development of organic waste infrastructure to help the state achieve its greenhouse gas reduction goals and waste reduction goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 1826)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Research and Development Program [42650. - 42651.]

42650.

The board may establish a research and development program, based on priorities that are consistent with Section 40051, and designed to identify, develop, and refine processes and technologies that will assist state and local governments and private industries to implement innovative resource management and waste reduction programs. The board may conduct research and development programs, upon appropriation therefor by the Legislature, that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Establishing, in coordination with the Department of Conservation, a recycling extension service within the board to serve as a central clearinghouse for recycling research information.

(b) Establishing cooperative research and development facilities at universities and colleges in the state.

(c) Developing a research program to study the feasibility of using disposal site mining technology to extend the life of existing disposal sites, recover valuable resources, and to reuse the reclaimed disposal site in an environmentally sound manner.

(d) Establishing a research program to identify educational and promotional methods that can effect environmentally positive changes in human behavior.

(e) Conducting studies into hazards posed by special wastes and by ash and air emissions from the incineration of waste.

(f) Conducting research to develop statistical tools to establish computer-based data bases on waste characteristics, special waste volumes, and county and regional waste capacities.

(g) Analyzing disposal site encroachment problems and assisting local agencies in the development of effective public policy tools to discourage disposal site encroachment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1038, Sec. 29.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

42651.

In determining the types of research and development which may be undertaken pursuant to Section 42650, the board shall prioritize the allocation of funds for processes and technologies based upon the hierarchy established under Section 40051.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1292, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13.1. Short-Lived Climate Pollutants [42652. - 42656.]

42652.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The organic disposal reduction targets are essential to achieving the statewide recycling goal identified in Section 41780.01.

(b) Achieving organic waste disposal reduction targets requires significant investment to develop organics recycling capacity.

(c) More robust state and local funding mechanisms are needed to support the expansion of organics recycling capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 395, Sec. 6.   (SB 1383)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

42652.5.

(a) The department, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall adopt regulations to achieve the organic waste reduction goals for 2020 and 2025 established in Section 39730.6 of the Health and Safety Code. The regulations shall comply with all of the following:

(1) May require local jurisdictions to impose requirements on generators or other relevant entities within their jurisdiction and may authorize local jurisdictions to impose penalties on generators for noncompliance.

(2) (A) Shall include requirements intended to meet the goal that not less than 20 percent of edible food that is currently disposed of is recovered for human consumption by 2025.

(B) The department shall evaluate ways to maximize the local benefits of edible food recovery programs, and explore circumstances in which recovered food may be more suitable for use in local animal feed operations.

(3) Shall not establish a numeric organic waste disposal limit for individual landfills.

(4) Shall evaluate ways to incentivize carbon farming that advances healthy soils.

(5) May include different levels of requirements for local jurisdictions and phased timelines based upon their progress in meeting the organic waste reduction goals for 2020 and 2025 established in Section 39730.6 of the Health and Safety Code. The department shall base its determination of progress on relevant factors, including, but not limited to, reviews conducted
 pursuant to Section 41825, the amount of organic waste disposed compared to the 2014 level, per capita disposal rates, the review required by Section 42653, and other relevant information provided by a local jurisdiction.

(6) (A) May include penalties to be imposed by the department for noncompliance. If penalties are included, they shall not exceed the amount authorized pursuant to Section 41850.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, administrative civil penalties for a local jurisdiction that fails to procure a quantity of recovered organic waste products that meets or exceeds its recovered organic waste product procurement target established by the department pursuant to Section 18993.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations shall be imposed pursuant to the following schedule:

(i) On
 or after January 1, 2023, each jurisdiction shall procure a quantity of recovered organic waste products that meets or exceeds 30 percent of its recovered organic waste product procurement target.

(ii) On or after January 1, 2024, each jurisdiction shall procure a quantity of recovered organic waste products that meets or exceeds 65 percent of its recovered organic waste product procurement target.

(iii) On or after January 1, 2025, each jurisdiction shall procure a quantity of recovered organic waste products that meets or exceeds 100 percent of its recovered organic waste product procurement target.

(7) Shall take effect on or after January 1, 2022, except the imposition of penalties pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not take effect until two years after the effective date of the regulations.

(8) For purposes of determining a jurisdiction’s recovered organic waste procurement target pursuant to Section 18993.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, the jurisdiction’s population shall not include the number of residents included in low population or elevation waivers granted by the department pursuant to Section 18984.12 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(9) Recognizing the continued economic and logistical challenges of organic waste recycling and procurement in rural jurisdictions, a jurisdiction in possession of a rural exemption pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 18984.12 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on January 1, 2024, shall remain exempt from complying with the organic waste collection services requirements specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 18984) of, and the procurement
 requirements specified in Article 12 (commencing with Section 18993.1) of, Chapter 12 of Division 7 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations until January 1, 2037. The department shall adopt regulations to establish a process to renew the exemptions after that date for periods of up to five years.

(10) Specify that bear bins are not required to comply with the lid color requirements established by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 18981.1) of Division 7 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(11) The department may, in its discretion, create an adjusted recovered organic waste product procurement target schedule, not to exceed the requirements of the schedule set forth in this subdivision, which shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(12) No later than January 1, 2027, the department shall amend subdivision (f) of Section 18993.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations to include in the recovered organic waste products that a jurisdiction may procure to comply with Article 12 (commencing with Section 18993.1) of Chapter 12 of Division 7 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations pipeline biomethane converted exclusively from organic waste that is diverted from a landfill pursuant to Section 39730.6 of the Health and Safety Code and is consistent with Article 10 (commencing with Section 650) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) A local jurisdiction may charge and collect fees to recover the local jurisdiction’s costs incurred in complying with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(c) A local jurisdiction facing continuing violations of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) that commence during the 2022 calendar year may submit to the department a notification of intent to comply, as described in this section. Upon approval by the department, and implementation by the local jurisdiction, of a notification of intent to comply that meets the requirements of subdivision (e), a local jurisdiction may be eligible for both of the following:

(1) Administrative civil penalty relief for the 2022 calendar year pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) A corrective action plan pursuant to Section 18996.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) (1) For violations of the regulations that are disclosed in a
 notification of intent to comply that is approved by the department as meeting the requirements of subdivision (e), the department shall waive administrative civil penalties under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) during the 2022 calendar year if, and administrative civil penalties shall not accrue under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) during the 2022 calendar year if, the local jurisdiction implements the proposed actions according to the schedule proposed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e).

(2) For violations that commence during the 2022 calendar year and continue into the 2023 calendar year, administrative civil penalties may begin accruing as of January 1, 2023. Those administrative civil penalties accruing on and after January 1, 2023, shall be waived upon complete compliance with the terms of a corrective action plan pursuant to Section 18996.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) If a local jurisdiction fails to adhere to the proposed actions and schedule described in a notification of intent to comply pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e), the department may revoke its approval of the notification of intent to comply and impose administrative civil penalties for violations occurring during the 2022 calendar year retroactive to the date of violation.

(4) Notwithstanding any proposed actions and schedule provided by a local jurisdiction in an approved notification of intent to comply pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e), the department may instead address through a corrective action plan any violations disclosed in that notification that may take more than 180 days to correct. Under those circumstances, the proposed actions and schedule provided pursuant to an approved notification of intent to comply pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision
 (e) shall control until a corrective action plan is finalized.

(e) The department shall approve a notification of intent to comply if the department determines the notification meets the requirements of this subdivision. A notification of intent to comply shall be in writing, adopted by formal resolution by the governing body of the local jurisdiction, and filed with the department no later than March 1, 2022. The notification of intent to comply shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A description, with specificity, of the continuing violations.

(2) A detailed explanation of the reasons, supported by documentation, why the local jurisdiction is unable to comply.

(3) A description of the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic on
 compliance.

(4) A description of the proposed actions the local jurisdiction will take to remedy the violations within the timelines established in Section 18996.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations with a proposed schedule for doing so. The proposed actions shall be tailored to remedy the violations in a timely manner.

(f) The department shall respond in writing to a local jurisdiction within 45 business days of receiving a notification of intent to comply with an approval, disapproval, request for additional information, or timeline for a decision on approval or disapproval. If the department disapproves the notification of intent to comply due to the notification not meeting the requirements of subdivision (e), the department shall include in the response a justification for the disapproval.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 18996.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, the department may establish any maximum compliance deadline in a corrective action plan that it determines to be necessary and appropriate under the circumstances for the correction of a violation of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(h) A local jurisdiction may be credited for the procurement of recovered organic waste products without executing a direct service provider agreement with end users of recovered organic waste products if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The use of the recovered organic waste product by any entity is a result of the jurisdiction’s adoption or enforcement of ordinances, regulations, resolutions, or policies.

(2) The jurisdiction complied with all other
 recordkeeping and reporting requirements related to procurement targets, including verification, as determined by the department, that an entity is procuring on behalf of the jurisdiction.

(3) The recovered organic waste product is not applied to the recovered organic waste product procurement target of another jurisdiction.

(i) (1) A local jurisdiction may count compost produced and procured from the following compost operations, as described in Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as it read on January 1, 2024, towards its recovered organic waste procurement target:

(A) Vermicomposting operations.

(B) Operations composting green material, agricultural material, food material, and vegetative food
 material, if the total amount of feedstock and compost onsite at any one time does not exceed 100 cubic yards and 750 square feet.

(C) Mushroom compost. “Mushroom compost” means the composted growing substrate that remains after a crop has been harvested to completion.

(2) Paragraph (1) applies if a local jurisdiction adopts an ordinance or other enforceable mechanism requiring compost and vermicompost procured by the jurisdiction to comply with this subdivision and to be used in a manner that meets the definition of “land application” in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (24.5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations and that meets the pathogen, metals, and physical contamination limits that apply to existing composting facilities.

(j) A local jurisdiction may count up to 10
 percent of its recovered organic waste product procurement target with both of the following recovered organic waste products:

(1) Mulch produced from tree trimming operations conducted by the jurisdiction or a service provider operating under contract to the jurisdiction when applied to landscape areas owned or managed by the jurisdiction or given away to residents, if the local jurisdiction does both of the following:

(A) The local jurisdiction provides documentation of the amount of mulch used and distributed, and where it was applied.

(B) The local jurisdiction adopts an ordinance or other enforceable mechanism requiring that mulch be used in a manner that meets the definition of “land application” in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (24.5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of
 Regulations and that meets the pathogen, metals, and physical contamination limits that apply to existing composting facilities.

(2) Edible food recovered in compliance with Section 18991.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations generated from a commercial food generator located within the jurisdiction. The conversion factor to be used to convert tonnage in the annual recovered organic waste product procurement target for each jurisdiction to equivalent amounts of recovered organic waste product shall be one ton of edible food for each ton of organic waste in a recovered organic waste product procurement target.

(3) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit the proportion of recovered organic waste products described in subdivision (f) of Section 18993.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as it read on January 1, 2024, that a jurisdiction can
 count toward its recovered organic waste procurement target.

(k) To count recovered organic waste products listed in subdivisions (i) and (j) toward its recovered organic waste product procurement target, a local jurisdiction shall comply with applicable regulations.

(l) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), and until December 31, 2035, the following direct expenditures by a local jurisdiction may count towards its recovered organic waste product procurement target:

(A) Investments for community composting operations serving the jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, an investment made to establish or expand a compostable materials handling operation or community composting operation.

(B) Equipment that is used only to apply compost
 or mulch, including, and limited to, compost spreaders, drag harrows, chippers, stump grinders, and blowers, if the jurisdiction uses the equipment to spread compost or mulch in compliance with procurement requirements during the same year that the purchase expense is applied toward its recovered organic waste product procurement target.

(C) Development of compost or mulch distribution sites to make free compost and mulch accessible and available to residents.

(2) (A) The department may determine, in regulations, the appropriate conversion factors for the direct expenditures in paragraph (1). The expenditures may count for up to 10 percent of a jurisdiction’s total procurement target.

(B) Prior to the department’s adoption of regulations to implement this section, the conversion factor shall be
 twenty-one dollars and thirty-eight cents ($21.38) for each ton of organic waste in a product procurement target.

(m) (1) One or more local jurisdictions within the same county may determine a local per capita procurement target using information from a local waste characterization study for a period not to exceed five years after the completion of the study. A waste characterization study shall be performed by the local jurisdiction or jurisdictions, which shall apply the results of a study to the total amount of landfill disposal attributed to the local jurisdiction or jurisdictions by the department’s Recycling and Disposal Reporting System.

(2) A waste characterization study may be used if it meets all of the following criteria:

(A) It was performed within the prior five years. This
 subparagraph does not require a jurisdiction to conduct a local waste characterization study within a specified five-year cycle or to wait for a recalculation of the annual recovered organic waste product procurement target pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 18993.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) It includes all categories of organic waste used in the department’s most recent waste characterization study that was available at the time the waste characterization local study was performed.

(C) It includes a statistically significant sampling of solid waste disposed by the local jurisdiction or jurisdictions for which the local per capita procurement target will be determined.

(D) The geographic boundaries within which the study is conducted shall match the geographic boundaries of the
 jurisdiction or jurisdictions the local per capita procurement target will be applied to.

(E) It uses the most recent formula for the per capita procurement target developed by the department.

(F) The results of the study are submitted to the department in a form and manner determined by the department.

(3) The department may establish in regulations criteria for approving the methodology of a local waste characterization study.

(n) Commencing January 1, 2027, a local jurisdiction may procure a quantity of recovered organic waste products that meets or exceeds a five-year recovered organic waste product procurement target if the following conditions are met:

(1) On or before January 1,
 2027, and on or before January 1 every five years thereafter, the jurisdiction’s five-year recovered organic waste procurement requirement target is calculated by multiplying the annual procurement target by five. The department may grant a jurisdiction approval to begin the five-year period on any January 1 after January 1, 2027.

(2) On or before January 1, 2027, the jurisdiction has notified the department that it intends to comply using a five-year target.

(o) In adopting and revising regulations to implement this section, the department may consider both of the following:

(1) The development and adoption of a conversion factor for one ton of organic waste and one ton of compost applied locally to count towards a local jurisdiction’s organic waste procurement target.

(2) Other pathways to prioritize local use of compost.

(p) (1) The department may adopt regulations it determines to be necessary to implement and enforce the changes made to this section by Chapter 508 of the Statutes of 2021 as emergency regulations.

(2) Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of
 Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be filed with, but not be repealed by, the Office of Administrative Law and shall remain in effect until January 1, 2024.

(q) In order to reduce emissions from solid waste facilities that may be a potential source of methane emissions, the department, in conjunction with the